Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 4. Captured, Missing or Dead Persons

Cross references. —

As to presumption of death arising from seven years absence, see §

2-7-101

.

Law reviews. —

See “Belief in Death of Absent Consort as a Defense to a Charge of Bigamy,” 10 Wyo. L.J. 158.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

22 Am. Jur. 2d Death §§ 299 to 318.

§ 1-12-401.
Written
finding of presumed death admissible as evidence.

A written finding of
presumed death made by an officer or employee of the United States
authorized to make such finding, pursuant to the Federal Missing Persons
Act, 37 U.S.C. § 551 et seq., as now or hereafter amended, or a certified
copy of the finding, shall be received in any court, office or other
place in this state as evidence of the death of the person found to
be dead and the date, circumstances and place of his disappearance.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 96, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-186; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-12-701; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “ 37 U.S.C. § 551 et seq.” for “56 Stat. 143, 1092, and 58 Stat. 679; 50
U.S.C. App. Supp. 1001-107.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes this act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Constitution. Approved March 24, 2006.

Federal Missing Persons Act. —

The Federal Missing Persons Act, referred to in this section, was repealed in 1966. For present provisions, see 37 U.S.C. 551 et seq.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 1-12-402.
Official report that person is missing or captured as evidence of
person's condition.

An official written report,
record or certified copy thereof that a person is missing, missing
in action, interned in a neutral country, beleaguered, besieged, captured
by an enemy or is dead or alive, made by any officer or employee of
the United States authorized by any law of the United States to make
the report or copy, shall be received in any court, office or other
place in this state as evidence of the condition of that person.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 96, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 1-187; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-12-702.

§ 1-12-403.
Findings and reports and records deemed prima facie valid.

For the purposes of W.S.

1-12-401

and

1-12-402

, any finding, report, record or certified copy purporting
to have been signed by an officer or employee of the United States
shall be deemed prima facie to have been signed and issued by the
officer or employee pursuant to law, and the person signing shall
be deemed prima facie to have acted within the scope of his authority.
If a copy purports to have been certified by a person authorized by
law to certify the same, such certified copy shall be prima facie
evidence of his authority.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 96, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 1-188; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-12-703.

Severability. —

Section 4, ch. 96, Laws 1947, reads: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance be held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect any other provision or application of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.”